src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-v1_antaa_gt-norm.yaml
#Verb aikoa - # meaning '' - '' - GOLD
     aikoa+V+Inf: aikoa
     aikoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [aion, aijon]
     aikoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [aiot, aijot]
     aikoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aikoo
     aikoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [aioma, aijoma]
     aikoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [aiotta, aijotta]
     aikoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [aikova, aikoo, aiothaan, aijothaan]
     aikoa+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: [aiothaan, aijothaan]
     aikoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: [aio, aijo]
     aikoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [aioin, aijoin]
     aikoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [aioit, aijoit]
     aikoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [aiko, aikoi]
     aikoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [aioima, aijoima]
     aikoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [aioitta, aijoitta]
     aikoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [aioit, aijoit, aiothiin, aijothiin]
     aikoa+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: [aiothiin, aijothiin]
     aikoa+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: aikoisin
     aikoa+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: aikoisit
     aikoa+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: aikois
     aikoa+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: aikoisimma
     aikoa+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: aikoisitta
     aikoa+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [aikoisit, aikoisivva, aikoisiva]
     aikoa+V+InfE+Ine: aikoessa
     aikoa+V+InfE+Ins: aikoen
     aikoa+V+InfMa+Ill: [aikhoon, aikohmaan, aikomhaan]
     aikoa+V+InfMa+Ine: aikomassa 
     aikoa+V+InfMa+Ela: aikomasta 
     aikoa+V+InfMa+Ade: aikomalla 
     aikoa+V+InfMa+Abe: aikomatta 
     aikoa+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: aikova
     aikoa+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: aikovat
     aikoa+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [aiottava, aijottava]
     aikoa+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [aiottavat, aijottavat]
     aikoa+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: aikonu
     aikoa+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [aikohneet, aikonheet]
     aikoa+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [aiottu, aijottu]
     aikoa+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [aiotut, aijotut]
     aikoa+V+Pass+Cond: [aiottais, aijottais]
